Illinois, session 104th, HB223.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Entity Omnibus Act is amended by changing 5Section 101 as follows: 6    (805 ILCS 415/101)7    Sec. 101. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Entity Omnibus Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-561, eff. 7-1-18.)